Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-407
Structures; lighting; rules and regulations; division adopt.

All structures outside the corporate limits of cities and villages, exceeding a height of two hundred feet above the surface of the ground, and all structures within the corporate limits of cities and villages exceeding a height of five hundred feet shall be marked and lighted in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation. The division may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the marking and lighting of such structures in a manner calculated to prevent collisions with such structures by aircraft. It shall be the duty of the persons, firms, and corporations owning, maintaining, or using such structures to provide and maintain such marking and lighting.

Laws 1955, c. 7, § 7, p. 70;

Laws 1993, LB 472, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 68.